District of Columbia statutes.
23-701

Warrants for the arrest of fugitives from justice.

Whenever any person who is (1) within the District of Columbia, (2) charged with any offense committed in any State, and (3) liable by the Constitution and laws of the United States to be delivered over upon the demand of the Governor of that State, any judge of the Superior Court may, upon complaint on oath or affirmation of any credible witness, setting forth the offense, that the person is a fugitive from justice, and such other matters as are necessary to bring the case within the provisions of law, issue a warrant to bring the person so charged before the Superior Court, to answer the complaint.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 631, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

History

This section is referenced in § 16-803.01 and § 23-702.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 23-701.
1973 Ed., § 23-701.

Prior Codifications